Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 29 Phosphate Reduction

46-29-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be referred to as the “Phosphate Reduction Act of 1995”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 216, § 1.

46-29-2.
Legislative findings, intent, and objectives.

The general assembly hereby recognizes and declares that:

Whereas, excess nutrients, especially phosphorus, from municipal wastewater treatment plants, septic tanks, urban and agricultural losses may cause eutrophication resulting in algae blooms and low dissolved oxygen; and

Whereas, requiring the use of phosphate-free laundry detergents will reduce the amount of phosphorus in Rhode Island’s rivers, lakes, and estuaries at no cost to consumer or to municipalities; and

Whereas, requiring the use of phosphate-free laundry detergents will significantly reduce the amount of phosphorus that is released by municipalities at their wastewater treatment plants; and

Whereas, our neighbors the State of Connecticut and the Commonwealth of Massachusetts have enacted similar legislation to address the problem of excess nutrients in their waters;

The general assembly, therefore, has declared that it is the policy of the state to reduce phosphorus pollution at its source to protect waters of the state, protect beneficial uses of the waters of the state and create a cost effective approach to wastewater treatment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 216, § 1.

46-29-3.
Certain cleaning agents containing phosphorus prohibited.

No person may manufacture, store, sell, use, or distribute for sale or use any cleaning agent containing phosphorus in the State, except as otherwise provided in this section.

As used in this section, “cleaning agent” means a laundry detergent, dishwashing compound, household cleaner, metal cleaner or polish, industrial cleaner, or other substance that is used or intended for use for cleaning purposes.

This section shall not apply to cleaning agents which are used:

In agricultural or dairy production;

To clean commercial food or beverage processing equipment or containers;

As industrial or institutional sanitizers, metal brighteners, or acid cleaners, including those containing phosphoric acid or trisodium phosphate;

In industrial processes for metal, fabric, or fiber cleaning and conditions;

In hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, other health care facilities, or veterinary hospitals or clinics;

By a commercial laundry or textile rental service company or any other commercial entity:

To provide laundry service to hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, other health care facilities, or veterinary hospitals or clinics; or

To clean textile products supplied to industrial or commercial users of the products on a rental basis; or

To clean professional, industrial, or commercial work uniforms;

In the manufacture of health care or veterinary supplies;

In any medical, biological, chemical, engineering, or other such laboratory, including those associated with any academic or research facility;

As water softeners, antiscale agents, or corrosion inhibitors, where that use is in a closed system such as a boiler, air conditioner, cooling tower, or hot water heating system;

To clean hard surfaces including windows, sinks, counters, floors, ovens, food preparation surfaces, and plumbing fixtures.

This section shall not apply to cleaning agents which:

Contain phosphorus in an amount not exceeding five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) by weight;

Contain phosphorus in an amount not exceeding eight and seven-tenths percent (8.7%) by weight and which are intended for use in a commercial or household dishwashing machine;

Are manufactured, stored, sold, or distributed for use solely outside the state.

The Rhode Island department of environmental management may permit the use of a cleaning agent which contains phosphorus in an amount exceeding five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) but not exceeding eight and seven-tenths percent (8.7%) by weight upon a finding that there is no adequate substitute for the cleaning agent, or that compliance with this section would otherwise be unreasonable or create a significant hardship on the user. The Rhode Island department of environmental management may adopt rules to administer this section.

Any person who manufactures, sells or distributes any cleaning agent in violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 216, § 1.

46-29-4.
Right of appeal.

Any person aggrieved by any determination made by the director pursuant to this chapter may seek review of that determination before the administrative adjudication division of the department pursuant to Chapters 35 and 17.7 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 216, § 1.

46-29-5.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its declared purpose, which purpose is the reduction of phosphorus entering the waters of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 216, § 1.

46-29-6.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation made thereunder, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the chapter, rule, or regulation and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 216, § 1.